Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 18 Higher Education Expenditures on Abortions

History.

2021 ch. 148, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 148, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.

§ 21-16-1801.
Prohibition on expending funds for abortion.

As a condition of receiving or expending any monies or funds appropriated to the University of Wyoming, the University of Wyoming shall not expend any appropriated general funds for:

Elective abortions for students;

Group health insurance that provides coverage of elective abortions for students.

As a condition of receiving any monies or funds appropriated to the community college commission, a community college shall not expend any appropriated general funds for:

Elective abortions for students;

Group health insurance that provides coverage of elective abortions for students.

History.

2021 ch. 148, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 148, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.

Editor's note. —

This section was renumbered from
§

21-16-1701

as directed by the Legislative Service Office.